Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 5. Sale and Issuance of Bonds and Notes

§ 4641.
Loans to governmental units.

The Bank, for the purpose of this chapter, may lend money to governmental units through the purchase by the Bank of municipal bonds or revenue bonds of governmental units.
The Bank, under this chapter, may issue its bonds and notes and may otherwise assist governmental units as provided in this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 216

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 27, 1970; amended

1971, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, Feb. 14, 1972;

1987, No. 55

, § 14, eff. May 15, 1987.

§ 4642.
Amount and purpose; general obligation.

The Bank may issue its bonds or notes in such principal amounts as it shall deem necessary to provide funds for any purposes under this chapter, including:

The making of loans;

The payment, funding or refunding of the principal of, or interest or redemption premiums on, any bonds or notes issued by it whether the bonds or notes or interest to be funded or refunded have or have not become due;

The establishment or increase of reserves to secure or to pay bonds or notes or interest thereon and all other costs or expenses of the Bank incident to and necessary or convenient to carry out its corporate purposes and powers.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter or by the Bank, every issue of bonds or notes shall be general obligations payable out of any revenues or funds of the Bank, subject only to any agreements with the holders of particular bonds or notes pledging any particular revenues or funds. Any bonds or notes may be additionally secured by a pledge of any grant or contributions from the United States of America or the State or any governmental unit or any person, firm, or corporation or a pledge of any income or revenues, funds, or monies of the Bank from any source whatsoever.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 216

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 27, 1970.

§ 4643.
Form of issuance.

Bonds or notes of the Bank shall be authorized by resolution of the Bank and may be issued in one or more series and shall bear such date or dates, mature at such time or times, bear interest at such rate or rates of interest per annum or within such maximum rate, be in such denomination or denominations, be issued in coupon form payable to bearer, in registered form or in book entry form, carry such conversion or registration privileges, have such rank or priority, be executed in such manner, be payable from such sources in such medium of payment at such place or places within or without the State, and be subject to such terms of redemption, with or without premium, as the resolution provides.

The State Treasurer may, at the direction of the Bank, act as transfer agent or registrar for the exchange or transfer of registered bonds and notes or maintain records so that bonds and notes in book entry form may be effected and the Bank may contract with or otherwise designate a bank, trust company, or other person to maintain records so that bonds and notes in book entry form may be effected. Such bank, trust company, or other person, which may include the federal government or any of its agencies or instrumentalities or any officer, agency, or instrumentality of the State, may be located or have its principal office inside or outside the State. Bonds and notes in book entry form shall be effected by means of entries on the records of the State Treasurer or other designated person that shall reflect the description of the issue, the principal amount, the interest rate, the maturity date, and the owner of the bonds or notes and such other information as is deemed appropriate. The State Treasurer or other designated person may effect conversion between book entry bonds and notes and registered bonds and notes for owners of bonds or notes who request such a change. The State Treasurer or other designated transfer agent or registrar shall issue a confirmation of the transaction in the form of a written advice.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 216

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 27, 1970; amended 1983. No. 12, § 4, eff. March 29, 1983;

2015, No. 29

, § 15.

§ 4644.
Sale price.

Bonds or notes of the Bank may be sold at public or private sale at such price as the Bank determines.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 216

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 27, 1970.

§ 4645.
Administrative consent or conditions not required.

Bonds or notes may be issued under this chapter without obtaining the consent of any department, division, commission, board, bureau, or agency of the State, and without any other proceeding or the happening of any other conditions or things than those specifically required by this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 216

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 27, 1970.

§ 4646.
Approval of Governor and Treasurer.

No resolution or other action of the Bank providing for the issuance of bonds may be adopted or otherwise made effective without the prior approval in writing of the Governor and the State Treasurer.
The powers conferred by this section on the Governor and the State Treasurer shall be exercised with due regard for the rights of the holders of bonds of the Bank at any time outstanding, and nothing in, or done pursuant to, this section shall in any way limit, restrict, or alter the obligation or powers of the Bank or any director, officer, or representative of the Bank to carry out and perform in every detail each and every covenant, agreement, or contract at any time made or entered into by or on behalf of the Bank with respect to its bonds or for the benefit, protection, or security of the holders thereof.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 216

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 27, 1970.

§ 4647.
Payment or refunding of notes.

The Bank may from time to time issue its notes under this chapter and pay and retire or fund or refund the notes from proceeds of bonds or of other notes, or from any other funds or monies of the Bank available for that purpose in accordance with any contract between the Bank and the holders of the notes.
Unless provided otherwise in any contract between the Bank and the holders of notes, and unless the notes are otherwise paid, funded, or refunded, the proceeds of any bonds of the Bank issued among other things, to fund any outstanding notes, shall be held, used, and applied by the Bank to the payment and retirement of the principal of the notes and the interest due and payable thereon.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 216

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 27, 1970.

§ 4648.
Terms of agreement with bond or noteholder.

In any resolution of the Bank authorizing, or relating to the issuance of any bonds or notes, the Bank, in order to secure the payment of the bonds or notes and in addition to its other powers, may covenant and contract with the holders of the bonds or notes:

to pledge to any payment or purpose all or any part of its revenues to which its right then exists or may thereafter come into existence, and the monies derived therefrom, and the proceeds of any bonds or notes;

to covenant against pledging all or any part of its revenues, or against permitting or suffering any lien on those revenues or its property;

to covenant as to the use and disposition of any payments of principal or interest received by the Bank on municipal bonds, revenue bonds, or other investments held by the Bank;

to covenant as to establishment of reserves or sinking funds, the making of provision for them, and the regulation and disposition thereof;

to covenant with respect to or against limitations on any right to sell or otherwise dispose of any property of any kind;

to covenant as to any bonds and notes to be issued and their limitations and their terms and conditions and as to the custody, application, and disposition of their proceeds;

to covenant as to the issuance of additional bonds or notes or as to limitations on the issuance of additional bonds or notes and on the incurring of other debts;

to covenant as to the payment of the principal of or interest on the bonds or notes, as to the sources and methods of payment, as to the rank or priority of any bonds or notes with respect to any lien or security or as to the acceleration of the maturity of any bonds or notes;

to provide for the replacement of lost, stolen, destroyed, or mutilated bonds or notes;

to covenant against extending the time for the payment of bonds or notes or interest thereon;

to covenant as to the redemption of bonds or notes and privileges of exchange thereof for other bonds or notes of the Bank;

to covenant as to any charges to be established and charged, the amount to be raised each year or other period of time by charges or other revenues and as to the use and disposition to be made thereof;

to covenant to create or authorize the creation of special funds or monies to be held in pledge or otherwise for operating expenses, payment or redemption of bonds or notes, reserves, or other purposes and as to the use and disposition of the monies held in those funds;

to establish the procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract or covenant with or for the benefit of the holders of bonds or notes may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds or notes the holders of which must consent thereto, and the manner in which the consent may be given;

to covenant as to the custody of any of its properties or investments, the safe-keeping thereof, the insurance to be carried thereon, and the use and disposition of insurance monies;

to covenant as to the time or manner of enforcement or restraint from enforcement of any rights of the Bank arising by reason of or with respect to nonpayment of any principal or interest of any municipal bonds or revenue bonds;

to provide for the rights and liabilities, powers, and duties arising upon the breach of any covenant, condition, or obligation and to prescribe the events of default and the terms and conditions upon which any or all of the bonds, notes, or other obligations of the Bank shall become or may be declared due and payable before maturity and the terms and conditions upon which the declaration and its consequences may be waived;

to vest in a trustee or trustees within or without the State such property, rights, powers, and duties in trust as the Bank may determine, which may include any of the rights, powers, and duties of any trustee appointed by the holders of any bonds or notes and to limit or abrogate the right of the holders of any bonds of the Bank to appoint a trustee under this chapter or limiting the rights, powers, and duties of the trustee;

to pay the costs or expenses incident to the enforcement of the bonds or notes or of the resolution or of any covenant or agreement of the bank with the holders of its bonds or notes;

to agree with any corporate trustee that may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the State, as to the pledging or assigning of any revenues or funds to which the Bank has any rights or interest, and may further provide for such other rights and remedies exercisable by the trustee as may be proper for the protection of the holders of any bonds or notes of the Bank and not otherwise in violation of law, and the agreement may provide for the restriction of the rights of any individual holder of bonds or notes of the Bank;

to appoint and to provide for the duties and obligations of a paying agent or paying agents, or such other fiduciaries as the resolution may provide within or without the State;

to limit the rights of the holders of any bonds or notes to enforce any pledge or covenant securing bonds or notes; and

to make covenants other than and in addition to the covenants expressly authorized in this section, of like or different character, and to make covenants to do or refrain from doing such things as may be necessary, or convenient and desirable, in order to better secure bonds or notes or which, in the absolute discretion of the Bank, will tend to make bonds or notes more marketable, notwithstanding that the covenants or things may not be enumerated in this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 216

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 27, 1970; amended

1987, No. 55

, §§ 15, 16, eff. May 15, 1987.

§ 4649.
Purchase and disposition of own obligations.

The Bank may purchase bonds or notes of the Bank out of any of its funds or money available therefor.
The Bank may hold, cancel, or resell the bonds or notes subject to and in accordance with agreements with holders of its bonds or notes.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 216

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 27, 1970.

§ 4650.
Interest rates.

Notwithstanding section 1759 of this title, or any other law applicable to or constituting any limitation on the maximum rate of interest per annum payable on bonds or notes, or as to annual interest cost to maturity of money borrowed or received upon issuance of bonds or notes, or purporting to regulate lenders every governmental unit may contract to pay interest on, or an interest cost per annum for, money borrowed from the Bank and evidenced by its municipal bonds purchased by the Bank notwithstanding any statutory limitation as to rate of interest per annum payable or as to annual interest cost to maturity of money borrowed by such governmental unit.
Every governmental unit may contract with the Bank with respect to the loan or purchase and the contract shall contain the terms and conditions of the loan or purchase.
Every governmental unit may pay fees and charges required to be paid to the Bank for its services.
Notwithstanding sections 1759-1765 of this title or of any other law applicable to or constituting any limitation on the sale of municipal bonds or revenue bonds or notes, or purporting to regulate lenders any governmental unit may sell municipal bonds or revenue bonds or notes to the Bank without limitations as to denomination and the municipal bonds or revenue bonds or notes may be fully registered, registrable as to principal or in bearer form, may bear interest at a rate or rates in accordance with this section, may be evidenced in that manner and may contain other provisions not inconsistent herewith, and may be sold to the Bank without advertisement at a price of par and accrued interest, all as provided in the proceedings of the governing body of the governmental unit under which the municipal bonds or revenue bonds or notes are issued.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 216

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 27, 1970; amended

1987, No. 55

, § 17, eff. May 15, 1987;

1987, No. 203

(Adj. Sess.), § 20, eff. May 27, 1988.

§ 4651.
Exchange of coupon bonds.

The governing body of the governmental unit may provide for the exchange of coupon bonds for fully registered bonds and of fully registered bonds for coupon bonds and for the exchange of the bonds after issuance for bonds of larger or smaller denominations, all according to the proceedings authorizing their issuance, provided the bonds in changed form or denominations are exchanged for the surrendered bonds in the same aggregate principal amounts and in a manner that no overlapping interest is paid, and the bonds in changed form or denominations bear interest at the same rate or rates and mature on the same date or dates as the bonds for which they are exchanged.
When any exchange is made under this section the bonds surrendered by the holders at the time of the exchange shall be cancelled.
The exchange may be made only at the request of the holders of the bonds to be surrendered. The governmental unit may require all expenses incurred in connection with the exchange to be paid by the holders.
If any of the officers whose signatures appear on the bonds or coupons cease to be officers before the delivery of the bonds, their signatures shall be valid for all purposes, as if they had remained in office.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 216

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 27, 1970.

§ 4652.
Waiver of defenses; rights of holder.

On the sale and issuance of any municipal bonds or revenue bonds to the Bank by any governmental unit, that governmental unit is deemed to agree that on the failure of that governmental unit to pay interest or principal on any of the municipal bonds or revenue bonds owned or held by the Bank when payable, all defenses to nonpayment are waived; and further, with respect to municipal bonds, upon nonpayment and demand on that governmental unit for payment, if funds are not available in its treasury to make payment, the governing body of that governmental unit shall forthwith assess a tax on the grand list of the governmental unit, sufficient to make payment with 12 percent interest thereon, and cause the tax to be collected within 60 days; and further, with respect to revenue bonds, upon nonpayment and demand on that governmental unit for payment, such governmental unit shall make payment together with interest thereon of 12 percent, which shall be due and payable within 60 days; and further, notwithstanding any other law, including any law under which the municipal bonds or revenue bonds were issued by that governmental unit, the Bank upon nonpayment is constituted a holder or owner of the municipal bonds or revenue bonds as being in default. Also notwithstanding any other law as to time or duration of default or percentage of holders or owners of bonds entitled to exercise rights of holders or owners of bonds in default, or to invoke any remedies or powers thereof or of any trustee in connection therewith or of any board, body, agency, or commission of the State having jurisdiction in the matter or circumstance, the Bank may thereupon avail itself of all other remedies, rights, and provisions of law applicable in that circumstance, and the failure to exercise or exert any rights or remedies within any time or period provided by law may not be raised as a defense by the governmental unit.
All of the bonds of the issue of municipal bonds or revenue bonds of a governmental unit on which there is nonpayment, are for all of the purposes of this section deemed to be due and payable and unpaid.
The Bank may carry out the provisions of this section and exercise all of the rights and remedies and provisions of law provided or referred to in this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 216

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 27, 1970; amended

1987, No. 15

, § 18, eff. May 15, 1987.

§ 4653.
Bond anticipation notes.

Notwithstanding any law applicable to any governmental unit as to the period for temporary financing of any public improvement or purpose by issuance of its notes in anticipation of the issuance of permanent bonds or as to the renewal of bond anticipation notes, the Bank may purchase and the governmental unit may issue bond anticipation notes and may renew them from time to time provided that the bond anticipation notes, including renewals thereof, mature in such amounts and in such years not exceeding five years from the date of the original issuance as is agreed between the Bank and the governmental unit.
In connection with the transaction and purchase of bond anticipation notes, the Bank may by agreement with the governmental unit impose any terms, conditions, and limitations as in its opinion are proper and for the purposes and security of the Bank and the holders of its bonds or notes.
The failure of any governmental unit to comply with that agreement constitutes a failure of the governmental unit to pay principal of and interest on the bond anticipation notes under section 4652 of this title, and the Bank shall thereupon enforce all such rights, remedies, and provisions of law as it has under this section or are elsewhere provided.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 216

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 27, 1970.

§ 4654.
Marketability; certification.

All municipal bonds, revenue bonds, or other investments of monies of the Bank provided for under this chapter must at all times be purchased in negotiable form, subject to provision for any registration in the name of the Bank or for issuance in book entry form pursuant to section 1881 of this title. All municipal bonds and revenue bonds at any time purchased by the Bank must upon delivery to the Bank be accompanied by an approving opinion of bond counsel.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 216

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 27, 1970; amended

1971, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. Feb. 14, 1972;

1987, No. 55

, § 19, eff. May 15, 1987.

§ 4655.
Presumption of validity.

After issuance, all bonds or notes of the Bank shall be conclusively presumed to be fully authorized and issued by all the laws of this State, and any person or governmental unit shall be stopped from questioning their authorization, sale, issuance, execution, or delivery by the Bank.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 216

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 27, 1970.